Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,112
Mandatory indemnification.

(MBCA 8.52) A corporation
shall indemnify a director who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise,
in the defense of any proceeding to which the director was a party because
he or she was a director of the corporation against expenses incurred by the
director in connection with the proceeding.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 112.
January 1, 2017